Louisiana, session 2026, SB237.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Page 1 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
Section 1. R.S. 24:525(C)(5), (6), and (13) and (D) through (G) are hereby amended
and reenacted and R.S. 24:525(H) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§525. State child ombudsman; duties
* * *
C. The state child ombudsman shall have all of the following duties and
responsibilities:
* * *
(5) Periodically review the facilities and procedures of any institution or
residences residence, public or private, where a child has been placed by any state
agency or department.
(a) For purposes of this Section, the term "residences residence" means
congregate care facilities and does not include foster homes.
(b) For purposes of this Section, the term "access" means policies and
availability of services.
(6) Recommend changes in state policies concerning children, including
changes in the system of providing juvenile justice, child care childcare assistance,
foster care, and access to physical and mental health treatment.
* * *
(13)(a) Notify the senator and representative who represent the district in
which a child has died as a result of abuse or neglect, within twenty-four hours of his
knowledge of the death of the child. Notify all of the following within twenty-four
hours of being notified by the department of the fatality or near fatality of a
child:
(i) The senator and representative who represent the district in which a
child who has died, as a result of abuse or neglect, resided or, if unknown, the
district in which the child died.
(ii) The speaker pro tempore of the House of Representatives.
(iii) The president pro tempore of the Senate.
(iv) The chairs of the House and Senate committees on health and
welfare.
Page 2 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
(b) The notification shall include the information provided to the state
child ombudsman pursuant to Subparagraphs (E)(1)(a) through (d) of this
Section.
D.(1) Any state agency having responsibility for the custody or care of
children shall provide monthly notice to the state child ombudsman of the death of
a child in its custody or care.
(2) E.(1) The Department of Children and Family Services shall notify the
state child ombudsman in writing within three business days of receiving
information on the death a report of a fatality or near fatality of any child that had
been reported to the department for alleged whose fatality or near fatality is the
subject of a child abuse or neglect investigation. The notification shall include all
of the following:
(a) The date of the child's death.
(b) The age of the child.
(c) The biological sex of the child.
(d) The child's parish of residence.
(e) The identification number assigned to the report.
(f) The date on which the report was accepted for investigation.
(2) The Department of Children and Family Services shall notify the
state child ombudsman in writing within three business days after the
conclusion of an investigation into a fatality or near fatality of any child.
(a) When the determination is that the report is substantiated the
notification shall include all of the following:
(i) The identification number assigned to the report.
(ii) Whether the perpetrator had previously been reported to the
Department of Children and Family Services for alleged child abuse or neglect
of any child.
(iii) Whether the child had previously been the subject of a child abuse
or neglect report or investigation.
(iv) Whether the fatality or near fatality occurred during an active child
Page 3 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
protective services investigation or an open family services case.
(b) When the determination is that the report is inconclusive or
unsubstantiated the notification shall include all of the following:
(i) The identification number assigned to the report.
(ii) A statement that the report was not substantiated.
E.F. The standing committee of each house of the legislature having
responsibility for oversight shall perform a biennial review and evaluation of the
state child ombudsman and the provisions of this Section.
F.G. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and to the
extent allowed by federal law, the state child ombudsman shall have unrestricted
remote access to departmental computer networks, including access to any and
all case management systems, databases, and department policy and procedure
systems, pertaining to state agencies that provide services to children through
funds provided by the state. The child ombudsman shall not have the ability to
add to, edit, delete, alter, reproduce, or distribute any data or document in any
department's system. The child ombudsman may publish reports, findings, or
recommendations, or aggregate or de-identified data derived from information
accessed in accordance with this Subsection provided that no confidential or
personal identifying information is disclosed in violation of state or federal law.
The child ombudsman shall not disclose the identifying information concerning
an individual who initiated a report or complaint of alleged child abuse or
neglect contained within any network or case management system accessed
pursuant to this Section. The ombudsman shall, upon request, have permission
to view and use physical documents and records, including audio and video
recordings, relevant to the ombudsman's statutory duties. To the extent allowed by
federal law, such documents and records shall include but not be limited to the
applications and case files of the Louisiana Department of Health and the
Department of Children and Family Services except for the name and any identifying
information of the reporter of child abuse or neglect and restrictions provided in Title
IV-D of the Social Security Act and the Internal Revenue Code, juvenile court
Page 4 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
judgments and court minute entries, records and reports of children in the custody
of or under the supervision of the office of juvenile justice, student records in the
possession of the State Department of Education, any parish or city school board,
and any elementary or secondary education school, including charter schools. The
state child ombudsman shall comply with any and all restrictions imposed by law on
documents, data, or information considered confidential or privileged and furnished
to the state child ombudsman.
G.H. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the state
child ombudsman shall not be compelled to be a witness or be deposed in any case
where the state child ombudsman is not personally a defendant.
Section 2. R.S. 42:17(A)(12) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§17. Exceptions to open meetings
A. A public body may hold an executive session pursuant to R.S. 42:16 for
one or more of the following reasons:
* * *
(12) Testimony including identifying information and explicit details
related to physical or sexual abuse of children.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(32) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(32) R.S. 46:56, R.S. 46:52.2, 56, 123(K), 236.1.1 through 238, 284, 286.1,
439.1, 446.1, 1073, 1355, 1806, 1831.5, 1844, 1862, 1923, 2124.1, 2134, 2187, 2356,
2416, 2597, 2603, 2625
Page 5 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
* * *
Section 4. R.S. 46:56(F)(1), (2), (8), (9)(a), (e), and (g), and (10)(a) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 46:1(7), 51(17) and (18), and 52.2 are hereby enacted to
read as follows:
§1. Definitions
As used in this Title, the following definitions shall apply:
* * *
(7) "Near fatality" means an act that, as certified by a physician, places
the child in serious or critical condition.
* * *
§51. Duties of the department
The Department of Children and Family Services, through its secretary, shall
administer the public assistance and welfare laws of the state as follows:
* * *
(17) Establish a law enforcement liaison position for the state. The law
enforcement liaison shall have previous law enforcement experience and shall
serve as a resource for law enforcement referrals and to facilitate joint
investigations between the department and law enforcement, as necessary.
(18) Designate an employee primarily responsible for overseeing all
matters regarding child fatalities and near fatalities, including but not limited
to child death notification to the state child ombudsman in accordance with R.S.
24:525.
* * *
§52.2. Critical incident review team
A. Each child fatality and near fatality substantiated by the department
as being the result of abuse or neglect shall be reviewed by the critical incident
review team, hereinafter referred to as the review team. Any child fatality or
near fatality that was unsubstantiated by the department as being the result of
abuse or neglect may be reviewed by the review team at the discretion of the
chair of the review team.
Page 6 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
B. The review team shall consist of the following members:
(1) The secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services, or
his designee.
(2) The chief medical director of the Department of Children and Family
Services, or his designee.
(3) A representative of the Department of Justice designated by the
attorney general.
(4) A representative of the office of state police designated by the
superintendent of state police.
(5) A representative of the Louisiana Department of Health designated
by the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health.
(6) A coroner or forensic pathologist appointed by the president of the
Louisiana State Coroner's Association.
(7) A representative of a child advocacy center designated by the
Louisiana Alliance of Children's Advocacy Centers.
(8) The state child ombudsman, or his designee.
(9) A quality-improvement or continuous-improvement employee of the
Department of Children and Family Services with training in safety science or
human-factors analysis appointed by the secretary of the department.
C.(1) The representative of the Department of Justice designated by the
attorney general shall serve as the chair of the review team.
(2) The representative of the chair shall direct and coordinate meetings
of the review team.
(3) The review team shall hold regular meetings at least quarterly and
shall hold special meeting as determined by the chair.
D. Each member of the review team shall provide any information
created or obtained by their representative organization related to a child
fatality or near fatality that is being reviewed within thirty days of being
notified that the child fatality or near fatality is being reviewed.
E. The review team shall do all of the following:
Page 7 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
(1) Evaluate means by which a fatality or near fatality might have been
prevented.
(2) Report its findings to appropriate agencies and make
recommendations that may help to reduce the number of child deaths caused
by abuse or neglect.
(3) Make specific recommendations about policy or procedure needed to
address any issues raised in the review of the case and any recommendations for
further changes in policies, practices, rules, or statutes to address those issues.
F.(1) The review team, in order that it may perform its functions and
duties as provided in this Section, shall have access to any information,
documents, or records in the possession of any represented organization which
are pertinent to a fatality or near fatality selected for review.
(2) All records obtained by the review team, in accordance with the
provisions of this Section, shall be confidential and shall not be available for
subpoena nor shall such information be disclosed, discoverable, or compelled
to be produced in any civil, criminal, administrative, or other proceeding nor
shall such records be deemed admissible as evidence in any civil, criminal,
administrative, or other tribunal or court for any reason.
(3) In no instance shall the name or identifying information of the
reporter in a case of abuse or neglect be disclosed to the review team.
(4) The furnishing of confidential information, documents, and reports
in accordance with this Section by any person, agency, or entity furnishing such
information, documents, and reports shall not expose such person, agency, or
entity to liability and shall not be considered a violation of any privileged or
confidential relationship if the participant has acted in good faith in the
reporting as required in this Section.
* * *
§56. Applications and client case records; definitions; confidentiality; waiver;
penalty
* * *
Page 8 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
F. The following information shall not be subject to waiver and shall not be
released to applicants, recipients, or outside sources, except those outside sources
engaged in the administration of the programs of the department or when specifically
authorized by law:
(1) Records pertaining to foster care of children, investigations of abuse and
neglect of children, and other child welfare services. For the purposes of this
Paragraph, case records of children in abuse and neglect and foster care cases may
be reviewed by the state child ombudsman pursuant to R.S. 24:525, attorneys
who are appointed by a court of juvenile jurisdiction to represent the sole interest of
the children, and pursuant to court order, such case records may be reviewed by
court-appointed special advocates appointed pursuant to Children's Code Article
424.1. Prior to a court hearing, the department may provide to such attorneys and
court-appointed special advocates copies of the most recent case plan for the child
and his family, the most recent court order and court report, and the child's most
recent medical report reports, including but not limited to psychological
counseling and behavioral health assessments. Additionally, pursuant to Children's
Code Article 616, a judge of a court exercising juvenile jurisdiction may request, in
writing to the department, central registry record checks. However, in no instance
shall the name or identifying information regarding a complainant in neglect and
abuse cases or the case records of the foster parents be subject to such review. The
department may, however, provide foster parents all information from the
department's records and from other records to which the department has access
concerning a child in the foster home, and concerning the child's family, where such
information is necessary for the foster parents to properly care for the child. The
department may also provide surrogate parents representing the special education
interests of children in the department's custody with all information from the
department's records and from other records to which the department has access
where such information is necessary for the surrogate parents to properly advocate
for the children. In any child custody proceeding, after the issue has been raised of
the potential existence of a relevant departmental record concerning the abuse or
Page 9 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
neglect of a child who is the subject of that proceeding, the judge may contact the
local child protection unit to determine if such a record exists. If the department has
a substantiated report pursuant to Children's Code Article 615(B)(1) through (3), the
local child protection unit shall verbally advise the judge that such report is in the
possession of the unit. If the court finds that information which may be contained in
the report is necessary for an issue before the court, the court may order the release
of such information. If the report was unsubstantiated, such records shall be sealed
and accessible only pursuant to Children's Code Article 615.
(2) Information furnished to the department by persons, governmental
agencies, or other legal entities when such furnisher of information is subject to a
confidentiality statute or regulation which prohibits release of such information to
an outside source, and.
* * *
(8)(a) Case records involving investigation of reports of child abuse and
neglect shall be confidential in order to protect the rights of the child and his parents
or guardians. Information contained in such records shall only be made available as
provided in this Section or applicable state or federal laws or regulations.
(b) The department shall not disclose identifying information concerning an
individual who initiated a report or complaint of alleged child abuse or neglect,
except that the department shall disclose such information:
(i) To law enforcement involved in the investigation of a report or
complaint.
(ii) Pursuant pursuant to a court order after such court has reviewed, in
camera, the department's case record and finds reason to believe that the reporter
knowingly made a false report.
(9) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, limited public
disclosure of summary information contained in the child abuse or neglect records
of the Department of Children and Family Services may be made as follows:
(a) When there has been a child fatality or near fatality in which abuse or
neglect was medically determined by an examining physician to be a contributing
Page 10 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
factor in the cause of death or near fatality. For purposes of this Paragraph, "near
fatality" means an act as certified by the physician who examined the child which
placed the child in serious or critical condition.
* * *
(e) The department shall not publicly disclose any information concerning the
individual initiating a report or complaint. Providing information to law
enforcement for purposes of investigating a report or complaint shall not be
considered publicly disclosing the information.
* * *
(g) Nothing in this Paragraph shall limit the authority of the department to
disclose requested information to the parent or guardian of an abused or neglected
child as otherwise provided by law, unless the parent or guardian is the alleged
perpetrator or living with or in a relationship with the alleged perpetrator.
* * *
(10)(a) Upon written request, the department shall disclose limited
information contained in child abuse or neglect records or reports to the following:
(i) An examining physician healthcare provider of a child whom he
reasonably believes has been abused or neglected.
(ii) A committee or subcommittee of the legislature which has subject matter
jurisdiction over child protection legislation according to the rules of the respective
house, provided that such information is reviewed in closed session and kept
confidential.
(iii) The executive director of a day care center an early learning center or
residential provider, provided that the use of such information is limited to a
confidential employee disciplinary investigation of alleged abuse or neglect of a
child within that facility and the employee who is the subject of the disciplinary
investigation is the subject of the requested information. However, the department
shall have the authority to fine, revoke, or suspend the license of any day care center
or residential provider, after due notice and a hearing, if the executive director
releases the confidential information to an unauthorized person or persons. The
Page 11 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with rules and regulations to be
promulgated by the department.
(iv) The attorney who represents the child, the day care early learning
center, or an employee of the day care early learning center.
* * *
Section 5. Children's Code Arts. 508, 511(D), 609(A)(3), 610(A)(4)(a) and (D)
through (H), 612(A), (B), and (C), 619(A)(1), 620(A), and 725.5(A) are hereby amended and
reenacted and Children's Code Arts. 512(E), 524(B)(13), and 603(17)(p) and (33) are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
Art. 508. Multidisciplinary investigative team; scope of responsibility
A. Not later than February 15, 2004, a A multidisciplinary investigative team
shall be established for the investigation of child abuse within each judicial district.
B. The team shall be responsible for the investigation of all child sexual
abuse cases, abuse and neglect cases involving allegations of the commission of a
felony-grade crime against a child, and any other case involving trauma to a child,
in accordance with their agency scope of services, which is referred to the team by
any member and accepted by the team for investigation in compliance with the
interagency protocols developed and instituted in accordance with Articles 509 and
Article 510 of this Part.
C. Any child for whom the Department of Children and Family Services
or law enforcement has received a report of suspected sexual abuse or severe
physical abuse shall be referred to a child advocacy center for a forensic
interview in accordance with interagency protocols. The department or law
enforcement agency shall notify the child advocacy center within seventy-two
hours of receiving the report and the child advocacy center shall notify
members of the appropriate multidisciplinary team within twenty-four hours.
Every child advocacy center shall accept referrals from both the department
and law enforcement. The multidisciplinary team shall meet to review any case
in which a forensic interview has occurred. Law enforcement or the department
shall not close a case in which a forensic interview has occurred prior to the
Page 12 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
multidisciplinary team review.
C.D. Each team shall develop and institute interagency protocols in
accordance with Articles 509 this Article and Article 510 of this Part and shall
update the protocols as necessary.
* * *
Art. 511. Forensic interviewer; qualifications
* * *
D. The cost of employing and training the forensic interviewer is to be
decided on in the interagency protocols developed and instituted in accordance with
Articles 509 and Article 510 of this Part, and is not the responsibility of member
agencies unless agreed to in the protocols.
Art. 512. Composition of the multidisciplinary investigative team
* * *
E. Each governmental entity provided for in Paragraph B of this Article
shall have a representative in attendance at each multidisciplinary team
meeting. Each child advocacy center shall submit the attendance records for
each multidisciplinary team in the center's jurisdiction to the attorney general
every six months. The attorney general shall review the records for compliance
with this Article and shall notify any agency that is out of compliance.
* * *
Art. 524. Responsibilities
* * *
B. A child advocacy center shall be governed and managed so as to provide
at a minimum, for the following:
* * *
(13) Specialized policies for conducting forensic interviews with children
with disabilities or children who require special accommodations.
* * *
Art. 603. Definitions
As used in this Title:
Page 13 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
* * *
(17) "Mandatory reporter" is any of the following individuals:
* * *
(p) A court-appointed supervised visit monitor.
* * *
(33) "Near fatality" means an act that, as certified by a physician, places
the child in serious or critical condition.
* * *
Art. 609. Mandatory and permitted reporting; training requirements
A. With respect to mandatory reporters:
* * *
(3)(a) To familiarize mandatory reporters, as defined by Children's Code
Article 603, with their legal mandate for reporting suspected child abuse and neglect,
such mandatory Mandatory reporters shall be offered training on the statutory
requirements and responsibility of reporting child abuse and neglect and how to
identify the signs and symptoms of child neglect and abuse, including sexual
abuse and human trafficking. This The training shall be made available by the
child welfare division of the Department of Children and Family Services or any
other mechanism as approved by the department as long as it includes information
on the reporting procedure and the consequences of failing to report. The
department may provide for an annual competency assessment which may be
used for training purposes.
(b) Each mandatory reporter may obtain mandatory reporting training as each
mandatory reporter believes to be necessary in accordance with Subsubparagraph (a)
or (d) of this Subparagraph.
(c)(b) The appropriate state regulatory department, board, commission, or
agency for each category of mandatory reporter may shall provide continuing
education credit for the completion of the training pursuant to this Paragraph.
(d)(c) Any entity, including but not limited to hospitals, educational and
religious institutions, and nonprofits, may provide its employees, volunteers, or
Page 14 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
educational attendees with equivalent training pursuant to Subsubparagraph (a) of
this Subparagraph.
* * *
Art. 610. Reporting procedure; reports to the legislature and the United States
Department of Defense Family Advocacy Program
A. A reporter shall immediately report suspected child abuse or neglect or
that child abuse or neglect was a contributing factor in a child's death in the
following ways:
* * *
(4) Reports to the department shall be made as follows:
(a) A mandatory reporter shall make a report of suspected abuse or neglect
requiring immediate assistance via the designated state child protection reporting
hotline telephone number. A report of suspected abuse or neglect which is of a
nonemergency nature may be reported via the Louisiana Department of Children and
Family Services Mandated Reporter Portal. Reports may also be made in person at
any child welfare office. In receiving any report of child abuse or neglect, the
department or law enforcement agency shall clearly inform the reporter that,
unless the reporter requests anonymity, the department or law enforcement
agency may contact the reporter directly to obtain further information during
the investigation.
* * *
D. If the initial report was in oral form by a mandatory reporter, it shall be
followed by a written report made within five days via the online Mandated Reporter
Portal of the department or by mail to the centralized intake unit of the department
at the address provided on the website of the department; or, if necessary, to the local
law enforcement agency. The reporter may use a form for the written report, which
shall be developed, approved, and made available by the Department of Children and
Family Services. The form is optional and may be available electronically on the
department's website.
E.D.(1) All reports made to any local or state law enforcement agency
Page 15 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
involving abuse or neglect in which an individual provided for in Subparagraph
(A)(1) of this Article is believed responsible shall be reported to the department
within twenty-four hours in accordance with Paragraph A of this Article.
(2)(a) All reports made to the department involving abuse or neglect in which
someone other than an individual provided for in Subparagraph (A)(1) of this Article
is believed to be responsible shall be reported to the appropriate law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours by telephone.
(b) The department also shall report all cases of child death which involve
a suspicion of abuse or neglect as a contributing factor in the child's death to the
local and state law enforcement agencies, the office of the district attorney, the state
child ombudsman, and the coroner.
(3) Reports involving a felony-grade crime against a child shall be promptly
communicated to the appropriate law enforcement authorities as part of the
interagency protocols for multidisciplinary investigations of child abuse and neglect
in each judicial district as provided in Articles 509 and Article 510.
(4) The department shall communicate as soon as possible all reports
involving alleged child victims of sex trafficking to the Louisiana State Police for
referral to the appropriate local law enforcement agency for investigation or other
action as appropriate.
F.E. Any commercial film or photographic print processor who has
knowledge of or observes, within the scope of this professional capacity or
employment, any film, photograph, video tape, negative, or slide depicting a child
who he knows or should know is under the age of seventeen years, which constitutes
child pornography or child sexual abuse materials as defined in Article 603, shall
report immediately to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the
case. The reporter shall provide a copy of the film, photograph, videotape, negative,
or slide to the agency receiving the report.
G.F.(1) If a physician has cause to believe that a newborn was exposed in
utero to an unlawfully used controlled dangerous substance, as defined by R.S.
40:961 et seq., the physician shall order a toxicology test upon the newborn, without
Page 16 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
the consent of the newborn's parents or guardian, to determine whether there is
evidence of prenatal neglect. If the test results are positive, the physician shall issue
a report, as soon as possible, in accordance with this Article. If the test results are
negative, all identifying information shall be obliterated if the record is retained,
unless the parent approves the inclusion of identifying information. Positive test
results shall not be admissible in a criminal prosecution.
(2) If there are symptoms of withdrawal in the newborn or other observable
and harmful effects in his physical appearance or functioning that a physician has
cause to believe are due to the chronic or severe use of alcohol by the mother during
pregnancy or are the effects of fetal alcohol spectrum disorder, the physician shall
issue a report in accordance with this Article.
H.G.(1) All instances of alleged child abuse that occur in a school setting
shall be immediately reported by the school to the child's parent or legal guardian
and to local or state law enforcement, regardless of the alleged perpetrator.
(2) If more than one child is involved in the allegations, the school shall
immediately report to the parent or legal guardian of all involved children.
(3) Law enforcement shall begin an investigation of the allegations within
forty-eight hours of receiving the report.
(4) If more than one child is involved in the allegations, law enforcement
shall interview the parent or legal guardian of all children involved.
(5) Any sexual abuse cases in which the alleged perpetrator is a child shall
be referred to the Department of Children and Family Services. The department shall
assess the family of the child victim and the alleged child perpetrator to ensure child
safety and well-being in accordance with Children's Code Article 612(A)(3).
(6) For purposes of this Article, the following definitions shall apply:
(a) "School setting" means in a school building, on school grounds, in school
vehicles, or at any activities sponsored by a public, private, or charter school.
(b) "Sexual abuse" means the perpetration or attempted perpetration of R.S.
14:41, 42, 42.1, 43, 43.1, 43.2, 43.3, 43.4, 80, 81, 81.1, 81.2, 86, 89, or 89.1.
I.H.(1) The provisions of this Paragraph shall be known and may be cited as
Page 17 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
The Alfred C. Williams Child Protection Act.
* * *
Art. 612. Assignment of reports for investigation and assessment
A.(1) Upon receiving a report of abuse or neglect of a child who is not in the
custody of the state, the local child protection unit of, the department shall promptly
immediately assign a level of risk to the child based on the information provided by
the reporter.
(2) Reports of high risk shall be investigated immediately and intermediate
levels of risk shall be investigated promptly. This investigation shall include a
preliminary investigation as to the nature, extent, and cause of the abuse or neglect
and the identity of the person actually responsible for the child's condition. This
preliminary investigation shall include an inquiry as to whether there is reason to
know that the child is an Indian child. This preliminary investigation shall also
include an interview with the child and the child's parents or other caretaker and shall
include consideration of all available medical information provided to the
department pertaining to the child's condition. If the report is of sexual abuse, the
preliminary interview with the child shall only be to assess the immediate safety
of the child and a forensic interview at a child advocacy center shall be
scheduled immediately. This preliminary investigation shall also include an
immediate assessment of any existing visitation or custody order or agreement
involving the alleged perpetrator and the child. The department shall request a
temporary restraining order pursuant to Article 617, a protective order pursuant to
Article 618, or an instanter safety plan order pursuant to Article 619 or 620 if the
department determines that any previously ordered visitation or custody would put
the child's health, welfare, and safety at risk. Admission of the investigator on school
premises or access to the child in school shall not be denied by school personnel.
However, the request for a temporary restraining order or a protective order in
accordance with this Article shall not independently confer exclusive jurisdiction on
the juvenile court in accordance with Article 303.
(3) In lieu of an investigation, reports of low levels of risk and reports from
Page 18 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
law enforcement of child sexual abuse as provided for in Article 610 may be
assessed promptly through interviews with the family to identify needs and available
match to community resources. If during this assessment, it is determined that a child
is at immediate substantial risk of harm, the local child protection unit shall promptly
immediately conduct or participate in an intensive investigation.
(4) Any reports of sexual abuse in which the alleged perpetrator is a child
may be assessed immediately through interviews with family of the child victim
and the alleged child perpetrator to identify needs and available matches to
community resources. If, during this assessment, it is determined that a child
is at immediate substantial risk of harm, the local child protection unit shall
immediately conduct an intensive investigation.
(4)(5) During the investigation of a report from a treating health care
practitioner of physical abuse of a child who is not in custody of the state, at the
request and expense of the child's parent or caregiver, the department shall provide
copies of all medical information pertaining to the child's condition or treatment
obtained during the investigation to a board certified child abuse pediatrician for
purposes of conducting an independent review of the information. Any resulting
report shall be provided to the department and to the child's parent or caretaker and
shall be utilized in the department's ongoing assessment of risk and to determine
what action may be necessary to protect the health, welfare, and safety of the child.
Nothing in this Subparagraph shall be construed to prohibit granting an instanter
removal order pursuant to Article 615(B).
B. All persons, including without limitation mandatory and permissive
reporters, shall cooperate fully with investigative procedures, including independent
investigations and psychological evaluations of the child initiated by the parent on
behalf of the child. The provisions of this Paragraph shall not require the disclosure
of any communications between an attorney and his client or any confession or other
sacred communication between priest, rabbi, duly ordained minister, or Christian
Science practitioner and his communicant.
C. All interviews of the child or his parents conducted in the course of a child
Page 19 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
protective investigation shall be recorded tape-recorded, if requested by the parent
or parents recorded.
* * *
Art. 619. Instanter custody orders; instanter safety plan orders
A.(1) A peace officer, district attorney, or employee of the local child
protection unit of the department may file a verified complaint alleging facts
showing that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the child is in need of care
and that emergency removal or the implementation of a safety plan is necessary to
secure the child's health, welfare, and safety. The department shall request
instanter custody of any child that is in the custody of another state and located
in Louisiana until the child can be returned to the state of original jurisdiction.
* * *
Art. 620. Oral instanter orders
A.(1) In exceptional circumstances, the facts supporting the issuance of an
instanter order and the exceptional circumstances may be relayed orally, including
telephonically, to the judge, and the order directing that a child be taken into custody
or, upon request by the state, that an instanter safety plan order be implemented may
be issued orally.
(2) An oral instanter order may be executed if the department requests
instanter custody of any child that is in the custody of another state and located
in Louisiana until the child can be returned to the state of original jurisdiction.
* * *
Art. 725.5. Duties of the Department of Children and Family Services
A. The department shall be responsible for investigating reports of abuse or
neglect where the abuser is believed to be a parent or caretaker, a person who
maintains an interpersonal dating or engagement relationship with the parent or
caretaker, or a person living in the same residence with the parent or caretaker as a
spouse whether married or not as provided for in Article 610.
* * *
Section 6. Pursuant to R.S. 49:193, the Department of Children and Family Services
Page 20 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
and the statutory entities made a part of the department by law shall be re-created effective
June 30, 2026, and all statutory authority therefor is continued in accordance with the
provisions of Part XII of Chapter 1 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
Section 7. All statutory authority for the existence of the Department of Children and
Family Services and the statutory entities made a part of the department as re-created by
Section 6 of this Act shall cease as of July 1, 2029, pursuant to R.S. 49:191. However, the
Department of Children and Family Services may be re-created prior to such date in
accordance with the provisions of Part XII of Chapter 1 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950.
Section 8. The provisions of R.S. 49:193 are hereby superseded to the extent that
those provisions are in conflict with the provisions of this Act.
Section 9. R.S. 49:191(2)(h) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§191. Termination of legislative authority for existence of statutory entities; phase-
out period for statutory entities; table of dates
Notwithstanding any termination dates set by any previous Act of the
legislature, the statutory entities set forth in this Section shall begin to terminate their
operations on July first of each of the following years, and all legislative authority
for the existence of any statutory entity, as defined in R.S. 49:190, shall cease as of
July first of the following year, which shall be the termination date:
* * *
(2) July 1, 2028:
* * *
(h) The Department of Children and Family Services and all statutory
entities made a part of the department by law.
* * *
Section 10. R.S. 49:191(1)(h) is hereby repealed.
Section 11. Children's Code Articles 509 and 610(I) are hereby repealed.
Section 12. This Section and Sections 6 through 10 of this Act shall become effective
on June 30, 2026; if vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature,
this Section and Sections 6 through 10 of this Act shall become effective on June 30, 2026,
Page 21 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 237 ENROLLED
or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
Section 13.(A) The provisions of Sections 1 through 5 and 11 of this Act shall
become effective January 1, 2027.
(B) The provisions of this Section shall become effective upon signature by the
governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become
law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the
legislature, the provisions of this Section shall become effective on the day following such
approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 22 of 22
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.